Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 4 Habilitation of the Developmentally Disabled Generally

Cross references.

Plea in criminal case that defendant was insane or mentally incompetent at time act committed or is mentally incompetent to stand trial, §

17-7-130

et seq.

Protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults, T. 30, C. 5.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Rights of persons residing in long-term care facilities generally, § 31-8-100 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency receiving, evaluating and treatment facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-1.

Pretrial examination and for commitment because of incompetency to stand trial, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-3.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Olmstead Decision: The Road to Dignity and Freedom,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 651 (2010).

For article, “Olmstead’s Promise and Cohousing’s Potential,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 663 (2010).

For article, “From the Inside Out: Personal Perspectives of Six Georgians on Their Institutional Experiences,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 741 (2010).

For article, “The Constitutional Right to Community Services,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 763 (2010).

For article, “Reconsidering Makin v. Hawaii: The Right of Medicaid Beneficiaries to Home-Based Services as an Alternative to Institutionalization,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 803 (2010).

For article, “The Potential and Risks of Relying on Title II’s Integration Mandate to Close Segregated Institutions,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 855 (2010).

For article, “Beyond Residential Segregation: The Application of Olmstead to Segregated Employment Settings,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 875 (2010).

For article, “From Almshouses to Nursing Homes and Community Care: Lessons from Medicaid’s History,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 937 (2010).

For note, “Deinstitutionalization: Georgia’s Progress in Developing and Implementing an ‘Effectively Working Plan’ as Required by Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 699 (2009).